District of Columbia statutes.
1-207.21

Powers of the President during transitional period.

The President of the United States is hereby authorized and requested to take such action during the period following the date of the enactment of this chapter and ending on the date of the first meeting of the Council, by Executive Order or otherwise, with respect to the administration of the functions of the District government, as he deems necessary to enable the Board of Elections properly to perform its function under this chapter.

History

Dec. 24, 1973, 87 Stat. 779, Pub. L. 93-198, title VII, § 721

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-207.71.